Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-515
Contracts for services, supplies, and collective-bargaining agreements; authorized.

The school board or board of education of any school district may enter into contracts under such terms and conditions as the board deems appropriate, for periods not to exceed seven years, for the provision of utility services, refuse disposal, transportation services, maintenance services, financial services, insurance, security services, and instructional materials, supplies, and equipment and, for periods not to exceed four years, for collective-bargaining agreements with employee groups. This section does not permit multiyear contracts with individual school district employees.

Laws 1984, LB 333, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,154.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 268;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 3.

A contract continuation clause does not create a contract of indefinite duration in violation of this section. Central City Ed. Assn. v. Merrick Cty. Sch. Dist., 280 Neb. 27, 783 N.W.2d 600 (2010).